Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin BOAT STORAGE STRUCTURES; REQUIRED RULEMAKING.new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must amend Minnesota Rules, chapter 6115, to: new text end new text begin (1) amend the definition of "watercraft canopy" to replace the term "fabric covered roof" with "fabric- or metal-covered roof"; and new text end new text begin (2) allow placement of a boat storage structure on public waters without a permit if the boat storage structure has a fabric- or metal-covered roof and is otherwise not prohibited under Minnesota Rules, part 6115.0210, subpart 3. new text end